North Carolina, session 2025, HB693.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 90 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new Article
to read:
"Article 36A.
"Interstate Massage Compact.
"§ 90-637. Short title.
This Article shall be known and may be cited as the "Interstate Massage Compact."
"§ 90-637.1. Purpose.
The purpose of this Compact is to reduce the burdens on state governments and to facilitate
the interstate practice and regulation of massage therapy with the goal of improving public access
to, and the safety of, massage therapy services. Through this Compact, the member states seek
to establish a regulatory framework which provides for a new multistate licensing program.
Through this additional licensing pathway, the member states seek to provide increased value
and mobility to licensed massage therapists in the member states, while ensuring the provision
of safe, competent, and reliable services to the public.
This Compact is designed to achieve the following objectives, and the member states hereby
ratify the same intentions by subscribing hereto:
(1) Increase public access to massage therapy services by providing for a
multistate licensing pathway.
(2) Enhance the member states' ability to protect the public's health and safety.
(3) Enhance the member states' ability to prevent human trafficking and licensure
fraud.
(4) Encourage the cooperation of member states in regulating the multistate
practice of massage therapy.
(5) Support relocating military members and their spouses.
(6) Facilitate and enhance the exchange of licensure, investigative, and
disciplinary information between the member states.
(7) Create an Interstate Commission that will exist to implement and administer
the Compact.
(8) Allow a member state to hold a licensee accountable, even where that licensee
holds a multistate license.
*H693-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(9) Create a streamlined pathway for licensees to practice in member states, thus
increasing the mobility of duly licensed massage therapists.
(10) Serve the needs of licensed massage therapists and the public receiving their
services.
(11) Establish that nothing in this Compact is intended to prevent a state from
enforcing its own laws regarding the practice of massage therapy.
"§ 90-637.2. Definitions.
As used in this Compact, except as otherwise provided and subject to clarification by the
rules of the Commission, the following definitions apply:
(1) Active military member. – Any person with full-time duty status in the armed
forces of the United States, including members of the National Guard and
Reserve.
(2) Adverse action. – Any administrative, civil, equitable, or criminal action
permitted by a member state's laws which is imposed by a licensing authority
or other regulatory body against a licensee, including actions against an
individual's authorization to practice such as revocation, suspension,
probation, surrender in lieu of discipline, monitoring of the licensee, limitation
of the licensee's practice, or any other encumbrance on licensure affecting an
individual's ability to practice massage therapy, including the issuance of a
cease and desist order.
(3) Alternative program. – A nondisciplinary monitoring or prosecutorial
diversion program approved by a member state's licensing authority.
(4) Authorization to practice. – A legal authorization by a remote state pursuant
to a multistate license permitting the practice of massage therapy in that
remote state, which shall be subject to the enforcement jurisdiction of the
licensing authority in that remote state.
(5) Background check. – The submission of an applicant's criminal history record
information, as further defined in 28 C.F.R. § 20.3(d), as amended from the
Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible for retaining state
criminal records in the applicant's home state.
(6) Charter member states. – Member states who have enacted legislation to adopt
this Compact where such legislation predates the effective date of this
Compact as defined in G.S. 90-637.12.
(7) Commission. – The government agency whose membership consists of all
states that have enacted this Compact, which is known as the Interstate
Massage Compact Commission, as defined in G.S. 90-637.8, and which shall
operate as an instrumentality of the member states.
(8) Continuing competence. – A requirement, as a condition of license renewal,
to provide evidence of participation in, and completion of, educational or
professional activities that maintain, improve, or enhance massage therapy
fitness to practice.
(9) Current significant investigative information. – Investigative information that
a licensing authority, after an inquiry or investigation that complies with a
member state's due process requirements, has reason to believe is not
groundless and, if proved true, would indicate a violation of that state's laws
regarding the practice of massage therapy.
(10) Data system. – A repository of information about licensees who hold
multistate licenses, which may include, but is not limited to, license status,
investigative information, and adverse actions.
Page 2 House Bill 693-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(11) Disqualifying event. – Any event which shall disqualify an individual from
holding a multistate license under this Compact, which the Commission may
by rule specify.
(12) Encumbrance. – A revocation or suspension of, or any limitation or condition
on, the full and unrestricted practice of massage therapy by a licensing
authority.
(13) Executive committee. – A group of delegates elected or appointed to act on
behalf of, and within the powers granted to them by, the Commission.
(14) Home state. – The member state which is a licensee's primary state of
residence where the licensee holds an active single-state license.
(15) Investigative information. – Information, records, or documents received or
generated by a licensing authority pursuant to an investigation or other
inquiry.
(16) Licensee. – An individual who currently holds a license from a member state
to fully practice massage therapy, whose license is not a student, provisional,
temporary, inactive, or other similar status.
(17) Licensing authority. – A state's regulatory body responsible for issuing
massage therapy licenses or otherwise overseeing the practice of massage
therapy in that state.
(18) Massage therapy, massage therapy services, and the practice of massage
therapy. – The care and services provided by a licensee as set forth in the
member state's statutes and regulations in the state where the services are
being provided.
(19) Member state. – Any state that has adopted this Compact.
(20) Multistate license. – A license that consists of authorizations to practice
massage therapy in all remote states pursuant to this Compact, which shall be
subject to the enforcement jurisdiction of the licensing authority in a licensee's
home state.
(21) National licensing examination. – A national examination developed by a
national association of massage therapy regulatory boards, as defined by
Commission rule, that is derived from a practice analysis and is consistent
with generally accepted psychometric principles of fairness, validity, and
reliability, and is administered under secure and confidential examination
protocols.
(22) Remote state. – Any member state, other than the licensee's home state.
(23) Rule. – Any opinion or regulation promulgated by the Commission under this
Compact, which shall have the force of law.
(24) Single-state license. – A current, valid authorization issued by a member
state's licensing authority allowing an individual to fully practice massage
therapy, that is not a restricted, student, provisional, temporary, or inactive
practice authorization and authorizes practice only within the issuing state.
(25) State. – A state, territory, possession of the United States, or the District of
Columbia.
"§ 90-637.3. Member state requirements.
(a) To be eligible to join this Compact, and to maintain eligibility as a member state, a
state must do all of the following:
(1) License and regulate the practice of massage therapy.
(2) Have a mechanism or entity in place to receive and investigate complaints
from the public, regulatory or law enforcement agencies, or the Commission
about licensees practicing in that state.
House Bill 693-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Accept passage of a national licensing examination as a criterion for massage
therapy licensure in that state.
(4) Require that licensees satisfy educational requirements prior to being licensed
to provide massage therapy services to the public in that state.
(5) Implement procedures for requiring the background check of applicants for a
multistate license, and for the reporting of any disqualifying events, including
obtaining and submitting, for each licensee holding a multistate license and
each applicant for a multistate license, fingerprint, or other biometric-based
information to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for background checks;
receiving the results of the Federal Bureau of Investigation record search on
background checks and considering the results of such a background check in
making licensure decisions.
(6) Have continuing competence requirements as a condition for license renewal.
(7) Participate in the data system, including through the use of unique identifying
numbers as described in this Compact.
(8) Notify the Commission and other member states, in compliance with the terms
of the Compact and rules of the Commission, of any disciplinary action taken
by the state against a licensee practicing under a multistate license in that state,
or of the existence of investigative information or current significant
investigative information regarding a licensee practicing in that state pursuant
to a multistate license.
(9) Comply with the rules of the Commission.
(10) Accept licensees with valid multistate licenses from other member states as
established in this Compact.
(b) Individuals not residing in a member state shall continue to be able to apply for a
member state's single-state license as provided under the laws of each member state. However,
the single-state license granted to those individuals shall not be recognized as granting a
multistate license for massage therapy in any other member state.
(c) Nothing in this Compact shall affect the requirements established by a member state
for the issuance of a single-state license.
(d) A multistate license issued to a licensee shall be recognized by each remote state as
an authorization to practice massage therapy in each remote state.
"§ 90-637.4. Multistate license requirements.
(a) To qualify for a multistate license under this Compact and to maintain eligibility for
such a license, an applicant must meet all the following requirements:
(1) Hold an active single-state license to practice massage therapy in the
applicant's home state.
(2) Have completed at least 625 clock hours of massage therapy education or the
substantial equivalent which the Commission may approve by rule.
(3) Have passed a national licensing examination or the substantial equivalent
which the Commission may approve by rule.
(4) Submit to a background check.
(5) Have not been convicted or found guilty, or have entered into an agreed
disposition, of a felony offense under applicable state or federal criminal law,
within five years prior to the date of their application, where such a time period
shall not include any time served for the offense, and provided that the
applicant has completed any and all requirements arising as a result of any
such offense.
(6) Have not been convicted or found guilty, or have entered into an agreed
disposition, of a misdemeanor offense related to the practice of massage
therapy under applicable state or federal criminal law, within two years prior
Page 4 House Bill 693-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
to the date of their application where such a time period shall not include any
time served for the offense, and provided that the applicant has completed any
and all requirements arising as a result of any such offense.
(7) Have not been convicted or found guilty, or have entered into an agreed
disposition, of any offense, whether a misdemeanor or a felony, under state or
federal law, at any time, relating to any of the following:
a. Kidnapping.
b. Human trafficking.
c. Human smuggling.
d. Sexual battery, sexual assault, or any related offenses.
e. Any other category of offense which the Commission may by rule
designate.
(8) Have not previously held a massage therapy license which was revoked by or
surrendered in lieu of discipline to an applicable licensing authority.
(9) Have no history of any adverse action on any occupational or professional
license within two years prior to the date of their application.
(10) Pay all required fees.
(b) A multistate license granted pursuant to this Compact may be effective for a definite
period of time concurrent with the renewal of the home state license.
(c) A licensee practicing in a member state is subject to all scope of practice laws
governing massage therapy services in that state.
(d) The practice of massage therapy under a multistate license granted pursuant to this
Compact will subject the licensee to the jurisdiction of the licensing authority, the courts, and the
laws of the member state in which the massage therapy services are provided.
"§ 90-637.5. Authority of Interstate Massage Compact Commission and member state
licensing authorities.
(a) Nothing in this Compact, nor any rule of the Commission, shall be construed to limit,
restrict, or in any way reduce the ability of a member state to enact and enforce laws, regulations,
or other rules related to the practice of massage therapy in that state, where those laws,
regulations, or other rules are not inconsistent with the provisions of this Compact.
(b) Nothing in this Compact, nor any rule of the Commission, shall be construed to limit,
restrict, or in any way reduce the ability of a member state to take adverse action against a
licensee's single-state license to practice massage therapy in that state.
(c) Nothing in this Compact, nor any rule of the Commission, shall be construed to limit,
restrict, or in any way reduce the ability of a remote state to take adverse action against a
licensee's authorization to practice in that state.
(d) Nothing in this Compact, nor any rule of the Commission, shall be construed to limit,
restrict, or in any way reduce the ability of a licensee's home state to take adverse action against
a licensee's multistate license based upon information provided by a remote state.
(e) Insofar as practical, a member state's licensing authority shall cooperate with the
Commission and with each entity exercising independent regulatory authority over the practice
of massage therapy according to the provisions of this Compact.
"§ 90-637.6. Adverse actions.
(a) A licensee's home state shall have exclusive power to impose an adverse action
against a licensee's multistate license issued by the home state.
(b) A home state may take adverse action on a multistate license based on the
investigative information, current significant investigative information, or adverse action of a
remote state.
(c) A home state shall retain authority to complete any pending investigations of a
licensee practicing under a multistate license who changes their home state during the course of
House Bill 693-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
such an investigation. The licensing authority shall also be empowered to report the results of
such an investigation to the Commission through the data system as described in this Compact.
(d) Any member state may investigate actual or alleged violations of the scope of practice
laws in any other member state for a massage therapist who holds a multistate license.
(e) A remote state shall have the authority to do all of the following actions:
(1) Take adverse actions against a licensee's authorization to practice.
(2) Issue cease and desist orders or impose an encumbrance on a licensee's
authorization to practice in that state.
(3) Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require the
attendance and testimony of witnesses, as well as the production of evidence.
Subpoenas issued by a licensing authority in a member state for the attendance
and testimony of witnesses or the production of evidence from another
member state shall be enforced in the latter state by any court of competent
jurisdiction, according to the practice and procedure of that court applicable
to subpoenas issued in proceedings before it. The issuing licensing authority
shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage, and other fees required
by the service statutes of the state in which the witnesses or evidence are
located.
(4) If otherwise permitted by state law, recover from the affected licensee the
costs of investigations and disposition of cases resulting from any adverse
action taken against that licensee.
(5) Take adverse action against the licensee's authorization to practice in that state
based on the factual findings of another member state.
(f) If an adverse action is taken by the home state against a licensee's multistate license
or single-state license to practice in the home state, the licensee's authorization to practice in all
other member states shall be deactivated until all encumbrances have been removed from such
license. All home state disciplinary orders that impose an adverse action against a licensee shall
include a statement that the massage therapist's authorization to practice is deactivated in all
member states during the pendency of the order.
(g) If adverse action is taken by a remote state against a licensee's authorization to
practice, that adverse action applies to all authorizations to practice in all remote states. A
licensee whose authorization to practice in a remote state is removed for a specified period of
time is not eligible to apply for a new multistate license in any other state until the specific time
for removal of the authorization to practice has passed and all encumbrance requirements are
satisfied.
(h) Nothing in this Compact shall override a member state's authority to accept a
licensee's participation in an alternative program in lieu of adverse action. A licensee's multistate
license shall be suspended for the duration of the licensee's participation in any alternative
program.
(i) Joint Investigations. –
(1) In addition to the authority granted to a member state by its respective scope
of practice laws or other applicable state law, a member state may participate
with other member states in joint investigations of licensees.
(2) Member states shall share any investigative, litigation, or compliance
materials in furtherance of any joint or individual investigation initiated under
the Compact.
"§ 90-637.7. Active military members and their spouses.
Active military members, or their spouses, shall designate a home state where the individual
has a current license to practice massage therapy in good standing. The individual may retain
their home state designation during any period of service when that individual or their spouse is
on active duty assignment.
Page 6 House Bill 693-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"§ 90-637.8. Establishment and operation of Interstate Massage Compact Commission.
(a) Establishment. – The Compact member states hereby create and establish a joint
government agency whose membership consists of all member states that have enacted the
Compact known as the Interstate Massage Compact Commission. The Commission is an
instrumentality of the Compact member states acting jointly and not an instrumentality of any
one state. The Commission shall come into existence on or after the effective date of the Compact
as set forth in G.S. 90-637.12.
(b) Membership, Voting, and Meetings. – Each member state shall have and be limited
to one delegate selected by that member state's state licensing authority. The delegate shall be
the primary administrative officer of the state licensing authority or their designee. The
Commission shall by rule or bylaw establish a term of office for delegates and may by rule or
bylaw establish term limits. The Commission may recommend removal or suspension of any
delegate from office. A member state's state licensing authority shall fill any vacancy of its
delegate occurring on the Commission within 60 days of the vacancy. Each delegate shall be
entitled to one vote on all matters that are voted on by the Commission. The Commission shall
meet at least once during each calendar year. Additional meetings may be held as set forth in the
bylaws. The Commission may meet by telecommunication, video conference, or other similar
electronic means.
(c) Powers. – The Commission shall have all of the following powers:
(1) Establish the fiscal year of the Commission.
(2) Establish a code of conduct and conflict of interest policies.
(3) Adopt rules and bylaws.
(4) Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws.
(5) Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of this
Compact, the Commission's rules, and the bylaws.
(6) Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the name of the
Commission, provided that the standing of any state licensing authority to sue
or be sued under applicable law shall not be affected.
(7) Maintain and certify records and information provided to a member state as
the authenticated business records of the Commission, and designate an agent
to do so on the Commission's behalf.
(8) Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds.
(9) Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel, including, but not
limited to, employees of a member state.
(10) Conduct an annual financial review.
(11) Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties,
grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the
Compact, and establish the Commission's personnel policies and programs
relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel, and other related
personnel matters.
(12) Assess and collect fees.
(13) Accept any and all appropriate gifts, donations, grants of money, other sources
of revenue, equipment, supplies, materials, and services, and receive, utilize,
and dispose of the same; provided that at all times the Commission shall avoid
any appearance of impropriety or conflict of interest.
(14) Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or use any property, real,
personal, or mixed, or any undivided interest therein.
(15) Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise
dispose of any property real, personal, or mixed.
(16) Establish a budget and make expenditures.
(17) Borrow money.
House Bill 693-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(18) Appoint committees, including standing committees, composed of members,
state regulators, state legislators or their representatives, and consumer
representatives, and such other interested persons as may be designated in this
Compact and the bylaws.
(19) Accept and transmit complaints from the public, regulatory or law
enforcement agencies, or the Commission to the relevant member states
regarding potential misconduct of licensees.
(20) Elect a chair, vice-chair, secretary, and treasurer and such other officers of the
Commission as provided in the Commission's bylaws.
(21) Establish and elect an Executive Committee, including a chair and a
vice-chair.
(22) Adopt and provide to the member states an annual report.
(23) Determine whether a state's adopted language is materially different from the
model Compact language such that the state would not qualify for
participation in the Compact.
(24) Perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve
the purposes of this Compact.
(d) Executive Committee; Powers; Duties. – The Executive Committee shall have the
power to act on behalf of the Commission according to the terms of this Compact. The powers,
duties, and responsibilities of the Executive Committee shall include all of the following:
(1) Overseeing the day-to-day activities of the administration of the Compact,
including compliance with the provisions of the Compact, the Commission's
rules and bylaws, and other such duties as deemed necessary.
(2) Recommending to the Commission changes to the rules or bylaws, changes to
this Compact legislation, fees charged to Compact member states, fees
charged to licensees, and other fees.
(3) Ensuring Compact administration services are appropriately provided,
including by contract.
(4) Preparing and recommending the budget.
(5) Maintaining financial records on behalf of the Commission.
(6) Monitoring Compact compliance of member states and providing compliance
reports to the Commission.
(7) Establishing additional committees as necessary.
(8) Exercise the powers and duties of the Commission during the interim between
Commission meetings, except for adopting or amending rules, adopting or
amending bylaws, and exercising any other powers and duties expressly
reserved to the Commission by rule or bylaw.
(9) Other duties as provided in the rules or bylaws of the Commission.
(e) Executive Committee; Membership. – The Executive Committee shall be composed
of seven voting members and up to two ex officio members as follows:
(1) The chair and vice-chair of the Commission and any other members of the
Commission who serve on the Executive Committee shall be voting members
of the Executive Committee; and
(2) Other than the chair, vice-chair, secretary and treasurer, the Commission shall
elect three voting members from the current membership of the Commission.
(3) The Commission may elect ex officio, nonvoting members as necessary as
follows:
a. One ex officio member who is a representative of the national
association of state massage therapy regulatory boards.
b. One ex officio member as specified in the Commission's bylaws.
Page 8 House Bill 693-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(f) Commission Power to Remove Executive Committee Members. – The Commission
may remove any member of the Executive Committee as provided in the Commission's bylaws.
(g) Executive Committee Meetings. – The Executive Committee shall meet at least
annually. Executive Committee meetings shall be open to the public, except that the Executive
Committee may meet in a closed, nonpublic session of a public meeting when dealing with any
of the matters covered under subsection (k) of this section. The Executive Committee shall give
five business days advance notice of its public meetings, posted on its website and as determined
to provide notice to persons with an interest in the public matters the Executive Committee
intends to address at those meetings.
(h) Executive Committee Emergency Meetings. – The Executive Committee may hold
an emergency meeting when acting for the Commission to (i) meet an imminent threat to public
health, safety, or welfare; (ii) prevent a loss of Commission or participating state funds; or (iii)
protect public health and safety.
(i) Annual Report. – The Commission shall adopt and provide to the member states an
annual report.
(j) Meetings of the Commission. – All meetings of the Commission that are not closed
pursuant to this subsection shall be open to the public. Notice of public meetings shall be posted
on the Commission's website at least 30 days prior to the public meeting. Notwithstanding
subsection (g) of this section, the Commission may convene an emergency public meeting by
providing at least 24 hours prior notice on the Commission's website, and any other means as
provided in the Commission's rules, for any of the reasons it may dispense with notice of
proposed rulemaking under G.S. 90-637.10(l). The Commission's legal counsel shall certify that
one of the reasons justifying an emergency public meeting has been met. Notice of all
Commission meetings shall provide the time, date, and location of the meeting, and if the meeting
is to be held or accessible via telecommunication, video conference, or other electronic means,
the notice shall include the mechanism for access to the meeting.
(k) Nonpublic Commission Meetings. – The Commission may convene in a closed,
nonpublic meeting for the Commission to discuss any of the following:
(1) Noncompliance of a member state with its obligations under the Compact.
(2) The employment, compensation, discipline or other matters, practices or
procedures related to specific employees or other matters related to the
Commission's internal personnel practices and procedures.
(3) Current or threatened discipline of a licensee by the Commission or by a
member state's licensing authority.
(4) Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation.
(5) Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or sale of goods, services, or
real estate.
(6) Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person.
(7) Trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged or
confidential.
(8) Information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly
unwarranted invasion of personal privacy.
(9) Investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes.
(10) Information related to any investigative reports prepared by or on behalf of or
for use of the Commission or other committee charged with responsibility of
investigation or determination of compliance issues pursuant to the Compact.
(11) Legal advice.
(12) Matters specifically exempted from disclosure to the public by federal or
member state law.
(13) Other matters as promulgated by the Commission by rule.
House Bill 693-First Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the presiding officer shall state that the
meeting will be closed and reference each relevant exempting provision, and such reference shall
be recorded in the minutes.
(l) Meeting Minutes. – The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly
describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate summary of
actions taken, and the reasons therefore, including a description of the views expressed. All
documents considered in connection with an action shall be identified in such minutes. All
minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release only by a
majority vote of the Commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
(m) Financing of the Commission. – The Commission shall pay, or provide for the
payment of, the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing activities.
The Commission may accept any and all appropriate sources of revenue, donations, and
grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials, and services. The Commission may levy on and
collect an annual assessment from each member state and impose fees on licensees of member
states to whom it grants a multistate license to cover the cost of the operations and activities of
the Commission and its staff, which must be in a total amount sufficient to cover its annual budget
as approved each year for which revenue is not provided by other sources. The aggregate annual
assessment amount for member states shall be allocated based upon a formula that the
Commission shall promulgate by rule. The Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind
prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the Commission pledge the credit
of any member states, except by and with the authority of the member state.
The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The receipts
and disbursements of the Commission shall be subject to the financial review and accounting
procedures established under its bylaws. All receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the
Commission shall be subject to an annual financial review by a certified or licensed public
accountant, and the report of the financial review shall be included in and become part of the
annual report of the Commission.
(n) Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification. – The members, officers,
executive director, employees, and representatives of the Commission shall be immune from suit
and liability, both personally and in their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of
property or personal injury or other civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged
act, error, or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a
reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or
responsibilities; provided that nothing in this subsection shall be construed to protect any such
person from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the intentional or
willful or wanton misconduct of that person. The procurement of insurance of any type by the
Commission shall not in any way compromise or limit the immunity granted hereunder.
The Commission shall defend any member, officer, executive director, employee, and
representative of the Commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of
any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of Commission
employment, duties, or responsibilities, or as determined by the Commission that the person
against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope
of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing herein shall be
construed to prohibit that person from retaining their own counsel at their own expense; and
provided further, that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that person's
intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.
The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member, officer, executive director,
employee, and representative of the Commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment
obtained against that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that
occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that such
person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Commission
Page 10 House Bill 693-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission
did not result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person.
Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the liability of any licensee for
professional malpractice or misconduct, which shall be governed solely by any other applicable
state laws. Nothing in this Compact shall be interpreted to waive or otherwise abrogate a member
state's state action immunity or state action affirmative defense with respect to antitrust claims
under the Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or any other state or federal antitrust or anticompetitive law
or regulation. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity
by the member states or by the Commission.
"§ 90-637.9. Data system.
(a) The Commission shall provide for the development, maintenance, operation, and
utilization of a coordinated database and reporting system.
(b) The Commission shall assign each applicant for a multistate license a unique
identifier, as determined by the rules of the Commission.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the contrary, a member state shall
submit a uniform data set to the data system on all individuals to whom this Compact is applicable
as required by the rules of the Commission, including all of the following:
(1) Identifying information.
(2) Licensure data.
(3) Adverse actions against a license and information related thereto.
(4) Nonconfidential information related to alternative program participation, the
beginning and ending dates of such participation, and other information
related to such participation.
(5) Any denial of application for licensure, and the reasons for such denial
(excluding the reporting of any criminal history record information where
prohibited by law).
(6) The existence of investigative information.
(7) The existence of current significant investigative information.
(8) Other information that may facilitate the administration of this Compact or the
protection of the public, as determined by the rules of the Commission.
(d) The records and information provided to a member state pursuant to this Compact or
through the data system, when certified by the Commission or an agent thereof, shall constitute
the authenticated business records of the Commission, and shall be entitled to any associated
hearsay exception in any relevant judicial, quasi-judicial, or administrative proceedings in a
member state.
(e) The existence of current significant investigative information and the existence of
investigative information pertaining to a licensee in any member state will only be available to
other member states.
(f) It is the responsibility of the member states to report any adverse action against a
licensee who holds a multistate license and to monitor the database to determine whether adverse
action has been taken against such a licensee or license applicant. Adverse action information
pertaining to a licensee or license applicant in any member state will be available to any other
member state.
(g) Member states contributing information to the data system may designate information
that may not be shared with the public without the express permission of the contributing state.
(h) Any information submitted to the data system that is subsequently expunged pursuant
to federal law or the laws of the member state contributing the information shall be removed from
the data system.
"§ 90-637.10. Rulemaking.
(a) The Commission shall promulgate reasonable rules in order to effectively and
efficiently implement and administer the purposes and provisions of the Compact. A rule shall
House Bill 693-First Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
be invalid and have no force or effect only if a court of competent jurisdiction holds that the rule
is invalid because the Commission exercised its rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond
the scope and purposes of the Compact, or the powers granted hereunder, or based upon another
applicable standard of review.
(b) The rules of the Commission shall have the force of law in each member state,
provided however that where the rules of the Commission conflict with the laws of the member
state that establish the member state's scope of practice as held by a court of competent
jurisdiction, the rules of the Commission shall be ineffective in that state to the extent of the
conflict.
(c) The Commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the criteria set forth
in this Article and the rules adopted thereunder. Rules shall become binding as of the date
specified by the Commission for each rule.
(d) If a majority of the legislatures of the member states rejects a rule or portion of a rule,
by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the Compact within four
years of the date of adoption of the rule, then such rule shall have no further force and effect in
any member state or to any state applying to participate in the Compact.
(e) Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the Commission.
(f) Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the Commission shall hold a public hearing and
allow persons to provide oral and written comments, data, facts, opinions, and arguments.
(g) Prior to adoption of a proposed rule by the Commission, and at least 30 days in
advance of the meeting at which the Commission will hold a public hearing on the proposed rule,
the Commission shall provide a notice of proposed rulemaking (i) on the website of the
Commission or other publicly accessible platform, (ii) to persons who have requested notice of
the Commission's notices of proposed rulemaking, and (iii) in such other ways as the Commission
may by rule specify.
(h) The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include all of the following:
(1) The time, date, and location of the public hearing at which the Commission
will hear public comments on the proposed rule and, if different, the time,
date, and location of the meeting where the Commission will consider and
vote on the proposed rule.
(2) If the hearing is held via telecommunication, video conference, or other
electronic means, the Commission shall include the mechanism for access to
the hearing in the notice of proposed rulemaking.
(3) The text of the proposed rule and the reason therefor.
(4) A request for comments on the proposed rule from any interested person.
(5) The manner in which interested persons may submit written comments.
(i) All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording and all written comments and
documents received by the Commission in response to the proposed rule shall be available to the
public.
(j) Nothing in this Article shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on each rule.
Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the Commission at hearings required by this
Article.
(k) The Commission shall, by majority vote of all Commissioners, take final action on
the proposed rule based on the rulemaking record.
(1) The Commission may adopt changes to the proposed rule provided the
changes do not enlarge the original purpose of the proposed rule.
(2) The Commission shall provide an explanation of the reasons for substantive
changes made to the proposed rule as well as reasons for substantive changes
not made that were recommended by commenters.
(3) The Commission shall determine a reasonable effective date for the rule.
Except for an emergency as provided in subsection (l) of this section, the
Page 12 House Bill 693-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
effective date of the rule shall be no sooner than 30 days after the Commission
issuing the notice that it adopted or amended the rule.
(l) Upon determination that an emergency exists, the Commission may consider and
adopt an emergency rule with 24 hours notice, provided that the usual rulemaking procedures
provided in the Compact and in this Article shall be retroactively applied to the rule as soon as
reasonably possible, in no event later than 90 days after the effective date of the rule. For the
purposes of this provision, an emergency rule is one that must be adopted immediately to (i) meet
an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare, (ii) prevent a loss of Commission or
member state funds, (iii) meet a deadline for the promulgation of a rule that is established by
federal law or rule, or (iv) protect public health and safety.
(m) The Commission or an authorized committee of the Commission may direct revisions
to a previously adopted rule for purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors in format,
errors in consistency, or grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the
website of the Commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any person for a period
of 30 days after posting. The revision may be challenged only on grounds that the revision results
in a material change to a rule. A challenge shall be made in writing and delivered to the
Commission prior to the end of the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision will take
effect without further action. If the revision is challenged, the revision may not take effect without
the approval of the Commission.
(n) No member state's rulemaking requirements shall apply under this Compact.
"§ 90-637.11. Oversight, dispute resolution, and enforcement.
(a) The executive and judicial branches of state government in each member state shall
enforce this Compact and take all actions necessary and appropriate to implement the Compact.
(b) Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the Commission shall be
brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the principal office of
the Commission is located. The Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the
extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings. Nothing
herein shall affect or limit the selection or propriety of venue in any action against a licensee for
professional malpractice, misconduct, or any such similar matter.
(c) The Commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in any proceeding
regarding the enforcement or interpretation of the Compact and shall have standing to intervene
in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide the Commission service of process shall
render a judgment or order void as to the Commission, this Compact, or promulgated rules.
(d) If the Commission determines that a member state has defaulted in the performance
of its obligations or responsibilities under this Compact or the promulgated rules, the
Commission shall provide written notice to the defaulting state. The notice of default shall
describe the default, the proposed means of curing the default, and any other action that the
Commission may take and shall offer training and specific technical assistance regarding the
default. The Commission shall provide a copy of the notice of default to the other member states.
(e) If a state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state may be terminated
from the Compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the delegates of the member states,
and all rights, privileges, and benefits conferred on that state by this Compact may be terminated
on the effective date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the offending state of
obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default.
(f) Termination of membership in the Compact shall be imposed only after all other
means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate
shall be given by the Commission to the governor, the majority and minority leaders of the
defaulting state's legislature, the defaulting state's state licensing authority, and each of the
member states' state licensing authority.
House Bill 693-First Edition Page 13

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(g) A state that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations, and
liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination, including obligations that extend
beyond the effective date of termination.
(h) Upon the termination of a state's membership from this Compact, that state shall
immediately provide notice to all licensees who hold a multistate license within that state of such
termination. The terminated state shall continue to recognize all licenses granted pursuant to this
Compact for a minimum of 180 days after the date of said notice of termination.
(i) The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a state that is found to be in default
or that has been terminated from the Compact, unless agreed upon in writing between the
Commission and the defaulting state.
(j) The defaulting state may appeal the action of the Commission by petitioning the U.S.
District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has its
principal offices. The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including
reasonable attorneys' fees.
(k) Upon request by a member state, the Commission shall attempt to resolve disputes
related to the Compact that arise among member states and between member and nonmember
states. The Commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both mediation and binding dispute
resolution for disputes as appropriate.
(l) The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall enforce the
provisions of this Compact and the Commission's rules.
(m) By majority vote as provided by Commission rule, the Commission may initiate legal
action against a member state in default in the United States District Court for the District of
Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has its principal offices to enforce
compliance with the provisions of the Compact and its promulgated rules. The relief sought may
include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the
prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorneys' fees.
The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the Commission. The Commission
may pursue any other remedies available under federal or the defaulting member state's law.
(n) A member state may initiate legal action against the Commission in the U.S. District
Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has its principal
offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of the Compact and its promulgated rules. The
relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement
is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including
reasonable attorneys' fees.
(o) No individual or entity other than a member state may enforce this Compact against
the Commission.
"§ 90-637.12. Effective date, withdrawal, and amendment.
(a) The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which the Compact statute is
enacted into law in the seventh member state. On or after the effective date of the Compact, the
Commission shall convene and review the enactment of each of the charter member states to
determine if the statute enacted by each such charter member state is materially different than the
model Compact statute.
(b) A charter member state whose enactment is found to be materially different from the
model Compact statute shall be entitled to the default process set forth in G.S. 90-637.11. If any
member state is later found to be in default, or is terminated or withdraws from the Compact, the
Commission shall remain in existence and the Compact shall remain in effect even if the number
of member states should be less than seven.
(c) Member states enacting the Compact subsequent to the charter member states shall
be subject to the process set forth in G.S. 90-637.8(c)(23) to determine if their enactments are
materially different from the model Compact statute and whether they qualify for participation
in the Compact.
Page 14 House Bill 693-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(d) All actions taken for the benefit of the Commission or in furtherance of the purposes
of the administration of the Compact prior to the effective date of the Compact or the Commission
coming into existence shall be considered to be actions of the Commission unless specifically
repudiated by the Commission.
(e) Any state that joins the Compact shall be subject to the Commission's rules and
bylaws as they exist on the date on which the Compact becomes law in that state. Any rule that
has been previously adopted by the Commission shall have the full force and effect of law on the
day the Compact becomes law in that state.
(f) Any member state may withdraw from this Compact by enacting a statute repealing
that state's enactment of the Compact. A member state's withdrawal shall not take effect until
180 days after enactment of the repealing statute. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing
requirement of the withdrawing state's licensing authority to comply with the investigative and
adverse action reporting requirements of this Compact prior to the effective date of withdrawal.
(g) Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this Compact, a state shall
immediately provide notice of such withdrawal to all licensees within that state. Notwithstanding
any subsequent statutory enactment to the contrary, such withdrawing state shall continue to
recognize all licenses granted pursuant to this Compact for a minimum of 180 days after the date
of such notice of withdrawal.
(h) Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent any
licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a member state and a nonmember
state that does not conflict with the provisions of this Compact.
(i) This Compact may be amended by the member states. No amendment to this Compact
shall become effective and binding upon any member state until it is enacted into the laws of all
member states.
"§ 90-637.13. Construction and severability.
(a) This Compact and the Commission's rulemaking authority shall be liberally construed
so as to effectuate the purposes, and the implementation and administration of the Compact.
Provisions of the Compact expressly authorizing or requiring the promulgation of rules shall not
be construed to limit the Commission's rulemaking authority solely for those purposes.
(b) The provisions of this Compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence,
or provision of this Compact is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be contrary to the
constitution of any member state, a state seeking participation in the Compact, or of the United
States, or the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance is held to
be unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder of this
Compact and the applicability thereof to any other government, agency, person, or circumstance
shall not be affected thereby.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, the Commission may deny a state's
participation in the Compact or, in accordance with the requirements of G.S. 90-637.11,
terminate a member state's participation in the Compact, if it determines that a constitutional
requirement of a member state is a material departure from the Compact. Otherwise, if this
Compact shall be held to be contrary to the constitution of any member state, the Compact shall
remain in full force and effect as to the remaining member states and in full force and effect as
to the member state affected as to all severable matters.
"§ 90-637.14. Consistent effect and conflict with other state laws.
Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any other law of a member state
that is not inconsistent with the Compact. Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal
requirements in a member state in conflict with the Compact are superseded to the extent of the
conflict. All permissible agreements between the Commission and the member states are binding
in accordance with their terms."
SECTION 2. The North Carolina Board of Massage and Bodywork Therapy may
adopt rules necessary to implement the provisions of Section 1 of this act.
House Bill 693-First Edition Page 15

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3. Sections 1 and 2 of this act become effective when at least seven states
have enacted the Interstate Massage Compact set forth in Section 1 of this act. The North Carolina
Board of Massage and Bodywork Therapy shall report to the Revisor of Statutes when the
Compact set forth in Section 1 of this act has been enacted by the seven member states. The
remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 16 House Bill 693-First Edition